Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [174.205] RESILIENT PAVEMENT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Baseline project" means a trunk highway project without revision to pavement design life. new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (d) "Modified project" means a project that is revised or under a revision analysis to contain a modified pavement design life using funds provided under the program. new text end new text begin (e) "Pavement cost" means the estimated total cost of pavement items for the project, in conformance with standard specifications for construction established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (f) "Program" means the resilient pavement program under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin Subject to available funds, the commissioner must establish a resilient pavement program to provide supplemental funding for revisions to pavement design of trunk highway projects on the basis of long-term cost effectiveness. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin (a) In implementing the program, the commissioner must: (1) establish procedures for identification, analysis, and selection of projects that receive funding and are accordingly revised in the pavement design; and (2) specify a modified pavement design life of at least 50 years for modified projects. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must determine pavement design life using the current standard models used by the department for pavement design. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Project eligibility; cost effectiveness. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for funds under the program, a project must: new text end new text begin (1) be for trunk highway construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or improvement; new text end new text begin (2) be included in a prior or the current state transportation improvement program or capital highway investment plan with a proposed design life of less than or equal to 20 years; new text end new text begin (3) be a modified project with a pavement design life as specified under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2); and new text end new text begin (4) have a cost effectiveness ratio, as calculated under paragraph (b), that equals or is greater than two. new text end new text begin (b) The cost effectiveness ratio is calculated as: new text end new text begin (1) the pavement cost of the baseline project, divided by the pavement design life of the baseline project; divided by new text end new text begin (2) the pavement cost of the modified project, divided by the modified pavement design life. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Use of funds. new text end new text begin (a) For a project selected under the program, the commissioner may expend program funds for up to 110 percent of the difference in anticipated pavement costs between the modified project and the baseline project. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may expend up to one-third of the funds on projects located wholly or substantially inside the Department of Transportation metropolitan district, as calculated using total funds under the program over (1) the current fiscal year, and (2) the latest prior two years in which funds are allocated. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must not expend funds under the program for program delivery. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Public information. new text end new text begin The commissioner must publish information regarding the program on the department's website. The information must include: new text end new text begin (1) a description of program implementation; new text end new text begin (2) identification of projects analyzed and selected under the program; and new text end new text begin (3) for each project selected, an overview that includes a brief project description, the pavement design changes, and information on expenditures from program funds. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RESILIENT PAVEMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $150,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the resilient pavement program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.205. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2035. Any excess amount cancels to the general fund. new text end